Mississippi statutes. Title 5. Legislative Department
Chapter 11. Abolishment of Agencies

§ 5-11-1.
Definitions.

The following terms as used in this chapter shall have the meanings ascribed to them in this section:

“Agency” means any agency as defined in Section 25-9-107(d);

“Agency facility” means any building or group of buildings that have been used for a function that the Legislature has abolished or transferred to another agency under provisions of general law;

“Abolished agency” means any agency, any public community or junior college or any state institution of higher learning whose enabling legislation has been repealed or has been amended so as to transfer authority for the agency’s duties and responsibilities, in whole or in part, to another agency;

“Complete and correct inventory” means a listing of all personal property, fixtures or real property titled to, or under the control of, an agency facility or abolished agency. Such listing shall be prepared by the agency that is to be responsible for the agency facility or the abolished agency’s duties and responsibilities, and shall contain all real and personal property titled to, or under the control of, the abolished agency or agency facility. After the preparation of the listing, the listing shall be reconciled against the master state property inventory of the Department of Audit for all accounts;

“Transition authority” means any council or group of persons authorized by law to provide oversight or plan the transfer of duties, property and services of an abolished agency or agency facility to another agency.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 447, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 5-11-3.
Transition authority required to develop plans to facilitate abolition of agency or agency facility; reports; audit.

Whenever the Legislature authorizes or requires the abolition of any agency or agency facility, the agency receiving the authority to perform the duties of the abolished agency or receiving the property of the abolished agency or agency facility for disposal or other use shall, before performance of the duties of the abolished agency or disposal of the agency facility property:

Develop task-based plans to facilitate the abolition of the agency or agency facility that shall include:

A statement of management responsibilities that clearly defines the sequential tasks of all personnel who will be responsible for carrying out the disposal or transfer of property, or the transfer of duties of the abolished agency; and

Projections of the time required to complete required tasks.

Compile a complete and correct inventory;

Write procedures and criteria governing the acquisition or disposition of any real or personal property under the control of, or titled to, the agency or agency facility abolished; and

Devise security plans and policies, with written security procedures governing access to any agency facility being abolished.

In addition to the requirements of subsection (1) of this section, the agency responsible for the duties of the abolished agency or responsible for the disposal of property of the agency facility shall prepare reports to the Legislature and Governor that include copies of all plans and procedures required under this section and a detailed written account of the actual accomplishments of the agency responsible for administering the abolition of the agency or agency facility. Such reports shall be delivered to the Legislature and the Governor not less than ninety (90) days after the effective date of the act requiring the abolishment of the agency or agency facility.

In addition to all reports, plans and procedures required under subsection 1 of this section, the State Department of Audit shall prepare a complete financial audit of any agency facility or abolished agency. Such audit shall be complete not less than ninety (90) days after the effective date of the act requiring the abolishment of the agency of agency facility.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 447, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 5-11-5.
Powers and duties of transition authority.

Whenever the Legislature creates a transition authority, the transition authority may carry out all functions provided for under Section 5-11-3 except for those duties conferred upon the State Department of Audit. If the transition authority does not express an intention in its official minutes of carrying out all functions provided for under Section 5-11-3 within ten (10) days of its creation under law, then it shall have no authority to perform such acts provided for under Section 5-11-3. If the transition authority chooses to perform the functions of Section 5-11-3, it shall do so in strict conformity with the provisions of 5-11-3. If the transition authority chooses not to perform these functions, it may review any plans, procedures or reports required under this chapter, but shall not impede or otherwise interfere with the activities of any agency authorized under law to perform any acts required under this chapter or any other laws of the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 447, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1991.